nlb/book-to-pef/src/main/resources/hyph/hyph_nb_NO.dic
.vas9spreiar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreiarane./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreiarar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreiaren./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreier./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreiere./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreieren./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreierer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreierne./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spring./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sp1rin1gen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9springene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9springer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprut./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprutane./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprutar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spruten./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stamp./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stam1pane./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stam1par./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stampen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stand./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standane./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stan1den./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stander./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsforskjell./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsforskjellen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsforskjellene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsforskjeller./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmerka./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmerke./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmerkene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmerker./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmerket./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmer1ki./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoff./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffa./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffet./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stof1fi./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffperoksid./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffperoksida./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffperoksidene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffperoksider./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffperoksidet./ss=s,3,2
.vas9straum./ss=s,3,2
.vas9straumen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9strimer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styremakt./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styremakta./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styremak1tene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styremakter./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sty1re1smakt./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styresmakta./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styresmaktene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styre1smak1ter./ss=s,3,2
.vas9syk./ss=s,3,2
.vas9syke./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sykere./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sykest./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sykeste./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sykt./ss=s,3,2
.vat9teppa./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppe./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppene./tt=t,3,2
.vat9tepper./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppet./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppets./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppi./tt=t,3,2
.vek9kvarvo./kk=k,3,2
.vil9laks./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lak1sen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksene./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksens./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lakser./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laks1stamme./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksstammen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksstammene./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksstammer./ll=l,3,2
.vil9led./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leda./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lede./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledede./ll=l,3,2
.vil9le1delse./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledelsen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledelsens./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledende./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leder./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledere./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lederen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lederer./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lederne./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledes./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledet./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledete./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledning./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledningen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledningene./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledningens./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledninger./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lei./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leia./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiande./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiast./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leid./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leidd./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leidde./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leide./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leie./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiede./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiende./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leier./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leies./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiet./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiete./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiing./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiinga./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiingane./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiingar./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiingen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiingens./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiingi./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leitt./ll=l,3,2
.visit9tid./tt=t,5,2
.visit9tida./tt=t,5,2
.visit9ti1den./tt=t,5,2
.visit9tidene./tt=t,5,2
.visit9tidens./tt=t,5,2
.visit9tider./tt=t,5,2
.visit9tidi./tt=t,5,2
.vis9skap./ss=s,3,2
.vitas9stilling./ss=s,5,2
.volleybal9lag./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9laga./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lag1ene./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9laget./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lagets./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lags./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lands1kamp./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landskampen./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landskampene./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landskampens./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landskamper./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9land1slag./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslaga./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslagene./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslaget./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslagets./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9leder./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9ledere./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lederen./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lederens./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lederes./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lederne./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9ledernes./ll=l,9,2
.wat9timane./tt=t,3,2
.wat9timar./tt=t,3,2
.wat9time./tt=t,3,2
.wat9timen./tt=t,3,2
.wat9timene./tt=t,3,2
.wat9timer./tt=t,3,2
Binærfil (standard inndata) samsvarer
